Utah statutes.
10-8-23.   Sidewalks -- Regulation and control -- Owners required to remove weeds, litter, snow and ice.

They may regulate and control the use of sidewalks and all structures thereunder or thereover; and they may require the owner or occupant, or the agent of any owner or occupant, of property to remove all weeds and noxious vegetation from such property, and in front thereof to the curb line of the street, and to keep the sidewalks in front of such property free from litter, snow, ice and obstructions.

